Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2630YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 456 Section 1. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. A city shall not adopt or enforce an 3 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment that restricts 4 an owner of real property located in a district zoned for 5 residential use with a speed limit of twenty-five miles per 6 hour or less from growing purposely planted vegetation not 7 otherwise prohibited by law that is forty-two inches or less in 8 height or, for that portion of the property abutting the curb 9 line that may obstruct a motoristâs view, thirty-four inches 10 or less in height. 11